Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.635.080

Director's connivance to employ uncertified teachers—Liability.

Any school district director who shall aid in or give his or her consent to the employment of a teacher who is not the holder of a valid teacher's certificate issued under authority of chapter 28A.410 RCW authorizing him or her to teach in the school district by which employed shall be personally liable to his or her district for any loss which it may sustain by reason of the employment of such person.

[ 1990 c 33 s 539; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.87.135. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 359 s 7, part; RRS s 5049, part; prior: 1907 c 240 s 16, part; 1903 c 156 s 7, part; 1897 c 118 s 165, part. Formerly RCW 28A.87.135, 28.87.130, part, 28.87.160.]